District of Columbia statutes.
49-306

Officers of staff departments.

The officers of the staff departments, staff corps, and the organizations created by this chapter when organized, shall be nominated by the Commanding General, subject to the examination required by law.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 775, ch. 328, §§ 20, 21
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 630, ch. 146, § 14
1981 Ed., § 39-306.
1973 Ed., § 39-207.